Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 32.1-323.
Department of Medical Assistance Services.

There is hereby established a Department of Medical Assistance Services, hereinafter referred to in this chapter as the Department. The Department shall be under the direction of the Secretary of Human Resources and a Director of Medical Assistance Services who shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the General Assembly.

History.

1984, c. 781.

Cross references.

As to exclusion of records relating to administrative investigations from the provisions of the Virginia Freedom of Information Act, see §

2.2-3705.3

.

As to The Virginia Health Savings Account Plan and the role therein for The Department of Medical Assistance Services, see §

38.2-5601

et seq.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2003, c. 460, cls. 1 to 3, provide:

“§ 1. Medical assistance services; consumer-directed care waiver.

A. The Department of Medical Assistance Services shall prepare and may seek approval of an application for (i) a revision of the consumer-directed personal care services waiver to allow spouses, parents, adult children, and guardians to direct care on behalf of the waiver recipient, when such recipient is incapable of directing such care on his own behalf and (ii) a new waiver for home- and community-based services, as soon as such waiver template shall become available. Any such waiver revision or new waiver shall be cost-neutral and shall expand consumer-directed care in so far as practicable. Any such waiver application shall protect the health and safety of recipients as well as the fiscal integrity of the Commonwealth. Such waiver shall provide for a fiscal agent to handle tax issues and payment of personal attendants on the part of recipients. In addition, any such waiver application shall (i) provide recipients with flexible choices and personal independence in so far as possible and (ii) include provisions for family members to deliver the covered services when consistent with and not prohibited by federal law and regulation.

“B. Neither this act nor any new or revised project that may be, but is not required to be, implemented pursuant to this act shall be construed as creating any legally enforceable right or entitlement to consumer-directed care, the Virginia Plan for Medical Assistance Services, or Title XIX of the Social Security Act, as amended, on the part of any person or to create any legally enforceable right or entitlement to participation in any consumer-directed care by any person.

“2. That, upon the approval by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services of any application for revision of the consumer-directed personal care services waiver or for any new waiver that may be submitted by the Department of Medical Assistance Services pursuant to this act, expeditious implementation of any revised or new consumer-directed care services shall be deemed to be an emergency situation pursuant to §

2.2-4002

of the Administrative Process Act; therefore, to meet this emergency situation, the Board shall promulgate emergency regulations to implement the provisions of this act.

“3. That, in order to avoid costs as much as possible during the regulatory process, the Board of Medical Assistance Services shall, when in compliance with the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.), notify, distribute, and provide public access and opportunity for comment via electronic media, including, but not limited to, posting documents to and receiving comments via the Department’s website, by e-mail and fax. The Board shall, however, continue to provide public notice and participation to those persons who do not have access to the Internet or other forms of electronic media.”

Acts 2016, c. 114, cl. 1 provides: “The Department of Medical Assistance Services shall issue a Request for Proposal for statewide nonemergency medical transportation services as soon as reliable rate setting is available, in order to enter a new contract by July 1, 2017.”

Acts 2017, c. 198, cl. 1 provides: “That the Department of Medical Assistance Services shall convene a work group to identify and develop processes for streamlining the application and enrollment process for the Commonwealth’s program of medical assistance services provided pursuant to the state plan for medical assistance, also known as Medicaid, and services provided through the Family Access to Medical Insurance Security (FAMIS) Plan for eligible incarcerated individuals so that applicable services shall be available to such individuals immediately upon release from the correctional facility. Such work group shall include representatives of the Departments of Social Services, Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, Corrections, and Juvenile Justice; the Virginia Sheriffs’ Association; the Virginia Association of Regional Jails; the Virginia Juvenile Detention Association; the Virginia Chapter of the National Alliance on Mental Illness; the Virginia Association of Community Services Boards; the Virginia League of Social Services Executives; and other relevant stakeholders. The work group shall identify and take such steps as may be feasible to implement an efficient and cost-effective process for (i) determining eligibility for Medicaid and FAMIS at the time of incarceration or detention and (ii) processing applications for eligible individuals incarcerated in state, local, or regional correctional facilities in order to ensure a seamless provision of appropriate Medicaid and FAMIS services upon release and reentry into society. The work group shall consider (a) how the Department of Medical Assistance Services’ Central Processing Unit may be leveraged to benefit this process and (b) how the process may also be utilized to ensure appropriate coverage for inpatient hospitalization of inmates eligible for Medicaid services. The Secretary of Health and Human Resources shall report his findings and recommendations, including information on any process improvements that have been implemented, any cost savings that have been identified, and any additional funding that may be necessary to fully implement the work group’s recommendations, to the Chairmen of the House Health, Welfare and Institutions Committee, Senate Education and Health Committee, House Appropriations Committee, and Senate Finance Committee by November 30, 2017.”

Acts 2018, c. 566, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. The Department of Medical Assistance Services (Department) shall make recommendations to the General Assembly for legislative, regulatory, or policy changes that provide flexibility to an individual enrolled in a home and community-based waiver to choose his place of residence in the Commonwealth and that ensure such individual’s informed choice of place of residence does not reduce, terminate, suspend, or deny services for which he is otherwise eligible. The Department shall report such recommendations to the House Committees on Appropriations and Health, Welfare and Institutions and the Senate Committees on Finance and Education and Health by November 1, 2018.”

Acts 2020, c. 841, cl. 1 provides: “That the Department of Medical Assistance Services shall convene a work group to evaluate the potential costs and benefits, including potential reductions in maternal and infant mortality rates, of amending the state plan for medical assistance services to include a provision for the payment of medical assistance for antepartum, intrapartum, or postpartum services provided to a pregnant person or to a person who is up to one year postpartum for labor and delivery support by a certified doula and at least four visits during the antenatal period and at least seven visits during the postpartum period with a certified doula. Such work group shall also develop recommendations related to an appropriate reimbursement rate for such services provided by certified doulas. The work group shall report its findings and recommendations to the Governor and the Chairmen of the House Committee on Appropriations and the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations by December 1, 2020.”

Acts 2020, c. 882, cl. 1 provides: “That the Department of Medical Assistance Services shall establish a work group to be composed of such stakeholders as the Department deems appropriate to evaluate the current Personal Maintenance Allowance amount established by the Commonwealth for individuals receiving Medicaid-funded waiver services and the impact of the current Personal Maintenance Allowance amount and other income limits on the ability of Medicaid waiver service recipients to engage in meaningful work and establish and maintain independence. The work group shall (i) evaluate the impact of the Commonwealth’s current Personal Maintenance Allowance amount on eligibility for Medicaid-funded waiver services among individuals who otherwise meet eligibility criteria; (ii) compare the Commonwealth’s current Personal Maintenance Allowance to actual expenses faced by individuals enrolled in the Commonwealth’s Medicaid waiver programs; (iii) determine the impact of the Commonwealth’s current Personal Maintenance Allowance amount on the ability of individuals receiving Medicaid-funded waiver services to engage in compensated employment; (iv) determine the impact on eligibility, enrollment, and cost to the Commonwealth of increasing the Commonwealth’s current Personal Maintenance Allowance amount; (v) make recommendations related to increasing the Commonwealth’s Personal Maintenance Allowance amount; and (vi) make recommendations for other changes to the Commonwealth’s Medicaid-funded waiver programs to encourage and support engagement in compensated employment among Medicaid-funded waiver service recipients. The work group shall report its findings and conclusions to the Governor, the General Assembly, and the Chairman of the Joint Commission on Health Care by November 1, 2020.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 313 QQ 3, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “a. Notwithstanding § 30-347, Code of Virginia, or any other provision of law, the Department of Medical Assistance Services shall have the authority to (1) amend the State Plan for Medical Assistance under Title XIX of the Social Security Act, and any waivers thereof, to implement coverage for newly eligible individuals pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 1396d(y)(1)[2010] of the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act and (2) begin the process of implementing a § 1115 demonstration project to transform the Medicaid program for newly eligible individuals pursuant to the provisions of 4.c. and eligible individuals enrolled in the existing Medicaid program. DMAS shall submit the § 1115 demonstration waiver application to CMS for approval. The department shall provide updates on the progress of the State Plan amendments and demonstration waiver applications to the Chairmen of the House Appropriations and Senate Finance Committees, or their designees, upon request, and provide for participation in discussions with CMS staff. The department shall respond to all requests for information from CMS on the State Plan Amendments and demonstration waiver applications in a timely manner.

“b. The demonstration project shall include the following elements in the design: The Department of Medical Assistance Services shall develop a supportive employment and housing benefit targeted to high risk Medicaid beneficiaries with mental illness, substance use disorder, or other complex, chronic conditions who need intensive, ongoing support to obtain and maintain employment and stable housing.

“c. The department shall have the authority to promulgate emergency regulations to implement these changes within 280 days or less from the enactment date of this Act.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 313 QQ 4, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “In the event that the increased federal medical assistance percentages for newly eligible individuals included in 42 U.S.C. § 1396d(y)(1)[2010] of the PPACA are modified through federal law or regulation from the methodology in effect on January 1, 2014, resulting in a reduction in federal medical assistance as determined by the department in consultation with the Department of Planning and Budget, the Department of Medical Assistance Services shall disenroll and eliminate coverage for individuals who obtained coverage through 42 U.S.C. § 1396d(y)(1) [2010] of the PPACA. The disenrollment process shall include written notification to affected Medicaid beneficiaries, Medicaid managed care plans, and other providers that coverage will cease as soon as allowable under federal law following the date the department is notified of a reduction in Federal Medical Assistance Percentage.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 212, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. That the Department of Social Services, in cooperation with the Department of Medical Assistance Services, shall convene a work group that shall include representatives of the Virginia Academy of Nutrition and Dietetics, the American Heart Association, the Virginia Farmers Market Association, the Virginia Chapter of the American Academy of Pediatrics, the Virginia Association of Free and Charitable Clinics, Medicaid managed care plans, the Virginia Association of Health Plans, and the Medical Society of Virginia to develop a plan for a three-year pilot Produce Rx Program (the Program) to incentivize consumption of qualifying fruits and vegetables by eligible individuals for whom increased consumption of fruits and vegetables is recommended by a qualified care provider. Such plan shall include (i) eligibility criteria for participation in the Program, including criteria for eligible individuals and qualified care providers; (ii) a process for enrolling eligible individuals in the Program; (iii) a process for the issuance by qualified care providers to eligible individuals of Program vouchers that may be redeemed for the purchase of qualifying fruits and vegetables; (iv) reporting requirements for qualified care providers who issue Program vouchers; and (v) a description of the role of the Department of Social Services and the Department of Medical Assistance Services and local government agencies in administering and overseeing the implementation of the Program. In developing such plan, the work group shall develop a detailed estimate of the cost of implementing the Program as a three-year pilot program, including state and local administrative costs, and identify sources of funding for such Program. The Department of Social Services shall report its activities and the elements of the plan to the Governor and the Chairmen of the House Committee on Appropriations and the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations by October 1, 2021.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess., cc. 223 and 224, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. The Department of Medical Assistance Services shall establish a work group composed of individuals with developmental disabilities, families of individuals with developmental disabilities, representatives of advocacy organizations, and other appropriate stakeholders to study and develop recommendations for the permanent use of virtual supports and increasing access to virtual supports and services for individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities by promoting access to assistive technology and environmental modifications. The Department shall report its findings and recommendations to the Governor and the General Assembly by November 1, 2021.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 476, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. That, during a public health emergency related to COVID-19 declared by the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services, the Department of Medical Assistance Services shall deem testing for, treatment of, and vaccination against COVID-19 to be emergency services for which payment may be made pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 1396b(v).”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 476, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not become effective unless the U.S. Health Resources and Services Administration COVID-19 Uninsured Program (the Program), which is identified by Catalog of Federal Domestic Assistance number 93.461, no longer funds claims reimbursement, whether due to termination of the Program or exhaustion of federal funds for the Program.”

§ 32.1-323.1.
Department to submit forecast of expenditures.

By November 15 of each year, the Department of Planning and Budget, in cooperation with the Department of Medical Assistance Services, shall prepare and submit an estimate of Medicaid expenditures for the current year and a forecast of such expenditures for the next two years to the House Committees on Appropriations and Health, Welfare and Institutions and to the Senate Committees on Finance and Appropriations and on Education and Health, and to the Joint Legislative Audit and Review Commission.

History.

1996, c. 193; 2000, cc. 593, 605.

Editor’s note.

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “Senate Committees on Finance and Appropriations” for “Senate Committees on Finance” and inserted “on” preceding “Education and Health.” March 10, 2021.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 593 and 605 are identical, and in the first sentence, inserted “Department of Planning and Budget, in cooperation with the,” deleted “in cooperation with the Department of Planning and Budget” preceding “shall prepare,” and added “and to the Joint Legislative Audit and Review Commission” to the end; and deleted the former second sentence, which read: “This section shall expire on July 1, 2004.”

§ 32.1-323.2.
Elimination of waiting lists for certain waivers.

It is the intent of the General Assembly to eliminate the waiting lists for services pursuant to the Intellectual Disability Medicaid Waiver and the Individual and Family Developmental Disabilities and Support Medicaid Waiver.

In furtherance of this intent, beginning with the fiscal year starting July 1, 2010, and for each fiscal year thereafter, the Department of Medical Assistance Services shall add (i) at least 400 additional funded slots per fiscal year for the Intellectual Disability Medicaid Waiver, and (ii) at least 67 additional funded slots per fiscal year for the Individual and Family Developmental Disabilities and Support Medicaid Waiver, until the waiting lists for the Intellectual Disability Medicaid Waiver and the Individual and Family Developmental Disabilities and Support Medicaid Waiver have been eliminated.

In addition, the Governor shall develop a plan to eliminate the waiting lists for services provided to individuals on the Intellectual Disability Medicaid Waiver and the Individual and Family Developmental Disabilities and Support Medicaid Waiver by the 2018-2020 biennium. The plan shall include provisions to reduce the total number of individuals on the waiting list for the Intellectual Disability Medicaid Waiver by 10 percent in the 2008-2010 biennium. The Governor shall submit the plan to the chairman of the Joint Commission on Health Care, and the Chairmen of the House Committee on Appropriations and the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations by October 1, 2009.

The Department of Medical Assistance Services shall work with the Department of Planning and Budget to incorporate additional costs pursuant to this section in the estimate of Medicaid expenditures required pursuant to §

32.1-323.1

.

History.

2009, cc. 228, 303; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2009, cc. 228 and 303, have been codified as §

32.1-323.2

at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

Acts 2015, c. 671, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. That the Department of Medical Assistance Services shall amend eligibility criteria for waivers supporting individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities to allow the dependent of an active duty member of the military who was added to the waiting list for services through such waivers while he was a resident of the Commonwealth to maintain his position on the waiting list following a transfer of the active duty military member to an assignment outside of the Commonwealth, so long as the active duty military member maintains the Commonwealth as his legal residence to which he intends to return following completion of military service.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 313 J 2, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding Chapters 228 and 303 of the 2009 Virginia Acts of Assembly and §

32.1-323.2

of the Code of Virginia, the Department of Medical Assistance Services shall not add any slots to the Intellectual Disabilities Medicaid Waiver or the Individual and Family Developmental Disabilities and Support Medicaid Waiver other than those slots authorized specifically to support the Money Follows the Person Demonstration, individuals who are exiting state institutions, any slots authorized under Chapters 724 and 729 of the 2011 Virginia Acts of Assembly or §

37.2-319

, Code of Virginia, or authorized elsewhere in this Act.”

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “the Chairmen of the House Committee on Appropriations and the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations” for “the chairmen of the House Appropriations and Senate Finance Committees.” March 10, 2021.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “Intellectual Disability Medicaid Waiver” for “Mental Retardation Medicaid Waiver” throughout the section.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Health Care Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 473 (2009).

§ 32.1-323.3.
Dependents of foreign service members; waiting lists for certain waivers.

The Department of Medical Assistance Services shall amend eligibility criteria for the Community Living waiver and the Family and Individual Support waiver to allow the dependent of a foreign service member who was added to the waiting list for services through such waivers while he was a resident of the Commonwealth to maintain his position on the waiting list following a transfer of the foreign service member to an assignment outside of the Commonwealth, so long as the foreign service member maintains the Commonwealth as his legal residence to which he intends to return following completion of the assignment.

History.

2019, c. 416.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 416 was codified as this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

§ 32.1-323.4.
Department to facilitate transition of persons between certain waiver programs.

To ensure that persons considering transitioning from the Home and Community-Based Services waiver program to the Medicaid Works program have sufficient information to make an informed choice regarding such transition, the Department shall establish a process for (i) conducting a comprehensive needs assessment of a person who chooses to participate in the Medicaid Works program to determine the services such person may need to live and fully participate in his community and (ii) developing a plan of support for such person to guide the person in selection of the best waiver program for his needs.

The Department shall establish a process to enable a person who transitions from a Home and Community-Based Services waiver program to the Medicaid Works program to retain his Home and Community-Based Services waiver slot for up to 180 days following the date of such transition.

The Department shall establish a process to give priority to individuals previously receiving services through the Home and Community-Based Services waiver program who transitioned to the Medicaid Works program and who subsequently seek to resume services through the Home and Community-Based Services waiver program.

History.

2020, c. 925.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 925, was codified as this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

§ 32.1-324.
Board of Medical Assistance Services.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Chapter 1 (§

32.1-1

et seq.), there shall be a State Board of Medical Assistance Services hereinafter referred to as the Board. The Board shall consist of eleven residents of the Commonwealth to be appointed by the Governor as follows: five of whom shall be health care providers and six of whom shall not; of these six, at least two shall be individuals with significant professional experience in the detection, investigation, or prosecution of health care fraud. Any vacancy on the Board, other than by expiration of term, shall be filled by the Governor for the unexpired portion of the term. No person shall be eligible to serve on the Board for more than two full consecutive terms. Appointments shall be made for terms of four years each, except that appointments to fill vacancies shall be made for the unexpired terms. The Board shall meet at such times and places as it shall determine. It shall elect from its members a chairman who shall perform the usual duties of such office. The Board shall submit biennially a written report to the Governor and the General Assembly.

The Director shall be the executive officer of the Board but shall not be a member thereof.

The Director shall be vested with all the authority of the Board when it is not in session, subject to such rules and regulations as may be prescribed by the Board.

History.

1984, c. 781; 1986, c. 440; 1989, c. 195; 1992, c. 107; 2012, c. 137.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, c. 137, cl. 2 provides: “That in order to fulfill the provisions of this act, the next two appointments of non-health care providers after the effective date of this act shall be individuals with significant professional experience in the detection, investigation, or prosecution of health care fraud.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 137 rewrote subsection A.

§ 32.1-324.1.
Authority to administer oaths, conduct hearings; obtaining relevant documents and other information.

The Director of the Department of Medical Assistance Services or his designee is authorized in the exercise and performance of official functions, duties, and powers under the provisions of this title to hold and conduct hearings, to administer oaths, and to take testimony under oath. The Director is authorized to make an ex parte application to the Circuit Court for the City of Richmond for the issuance of a subpoena, in furtherance of any investigation within the jurisdiction of the Department, to request the attendance of witnesses and the production of any relevant records, memoranda, papers, and other documents. The Court is authorized to issue and compel compliance with such subpoena upon a showing of good cause. The Court, upon determining that good cause exists to believe that evidence may be destroyed or altered, may issue a subpoena requiring the production of evidence forthwith.

In accordance with federal and state law, the Director or his designee shall conduct hearings on determinations of eligibility or continued eligibility of applicants or recipients for services under the state plan for medical assistance. In addition to the authority conferred upon the Director by subsection A of this section, the Director or his designee, in connection with any such proceedings, may issue subpoenas requiring the attendance of witnesses and the production of records, memoranda, papers, and other documents.

Failure or refusal to comply with a subpoena issued pursuant to subsection B of this section shall be punishable as a Class 4 misdemeanor.

History.

1986, c. 440; 1990, c. 383.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 4 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 32.1-324.2.
Director to facilitate communication.

In carrying out his duties under this chapter, the Director shall report to the Governor and members of the General Assembly the activities of facilitating communication between the Department and providers and recipients of health care services.

History.

1999, c. 965.

§ 32.1-324.3.
Uninsured Medical Catastrophe Fund established.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Uninsured Medical Catastrophe Fund, hereafter referred to as “the Fund.” The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All contributions from income tax refunds and any other source shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund.

Moneys in the Fund shall be used solely for the purposes of providing a source of payment for medical treatment of uninsured medical catastrophes. An uninsured medical catastrophe shall include a life-threatening illness or injury requiring specialized medical treatment, hospitalization, or both. The Board shall promulgate regulations that (i) further define an uninsured medical catastrophe, (ii) establish procedures for distribution of moneys in the Fund to pay for the costs of treating uninsured medical catastrophes, (iii) establish application procedures, and (iv) establish criteria for eligibility for assistance from the Fund and the prioritization and allocation of available moneys among applicants for assistance from the Fund.

Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the Director of Medical Assistance Services.

History.

1999, c. 998.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 1999 act having been

32.1-324.2

.